Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-215
Village; dissolution; how effected.

Any village incorporated under the laws of this state shall abolish its incorporation whenever a majority of the registered voters of the village, voting on the question of such abolishment, shall so decide in the manner provided in sections 17-215 to 17-219.03.

Laws 1885, c. 17, § 1, p. 156;

R.S.1913, § 5065;

C.S.1922, § 4237;

C.S.1929, § 17-215;

R.S.1943, § 17-215;

Laws 1998, LB 1346, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 79.

The power to terminate the corporate existence of a village was granted by ballot to the electors and, when exercised by a majority vote, the existence ceases. State ex rel. Banta v. Greer, 86 Neb. 88, 124 N.W. 905 (1910).